src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ 

                            :sjåvnål       METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
                   +Err/Orth:sjon         ELLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP     ; ! ! Makes strange "emosjonellalasj/emosjonælla/emosjonálla/emosjonella
                   +Err/Orth:tion         ELLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP     ; ! 
                   +Err/Orth:sjun         ELLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP     ; ! 
        +Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:sjonálal      METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ; ! Makes BADASS "emosjonálalasj"
        +Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:sjunálal      METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ; ! Makes BADASS "emosjunálalasj"

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: konstitusjåvnålasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ konstitusjåvnålasj:             konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ konstitusjåvnålattjav:          konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ konstitusjåvnålasj:             konstitusjåvnålasj+A+Attr


!! ###  Badly assimilated loanwords, some against norm others with no norm

LEXICON MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS !!= @CODE@ LOAN! Wronly assimilated -lasj adjectives from SE/NO -isk. Looks derived but isn't since there is no real noun to be derived from. Like mekanisk-mekánalasj, but "mekádna" is no real noun! Like  METÅVDÅLASJ, but gives the Err/Der tag, so it's only for these wronly/non-derived loan adjectives. 

+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last+Err/Der: MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ;

 

LEXICON ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED
+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: ARKTALASJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ARKTALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Foreign -isk, that are not real derivations. Same as MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS, but no +Use/-Spell tag since ther is no "right" way to assimilate these. This is a question for GG. Adapted to smj by simply adding -alasj in place of -isk. These are not real derivations, but sitation borrowed loan adjectives. Only words without a noun base, like arktisk and syntetisk. Pred and attr are both -lasj. No comparatives. 

! :asj VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR

! : VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                          :%>     ATTR_PrsPrc   ; ! No vuohta derivation in this lexicon
                   +Sg+Nom:%>     K-CONS        ;
          +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a%>    PxV           ; !
                          :a%>    SURGULASJ-EVEN ; ! Declined as four-syllable noun
! :a%>Q1 BU/MUS ;
         +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1t K-CONS        ;
                 +Cmp/SgNom:%>     R             ;
                 +Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R             ;
                 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R             ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: syntiehtalasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ syntiehtalasj:           syntiehtalasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ syntehtalasj:           syntiehtalasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ syntiehtalattjav:        syntiehtalasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ syntehtalattjav:        syntiehtalasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ syntiehtalasj:           syntiehtalasj+A+Attr
!!€ syntehtalasj:           syntiehtalasj+A+Attr


LEXICON ORÁNSSJA !!= @CODE@ Loan adjectives, not -isk. Used without the -lasj. Adjectives with attribute same as pred. So far only for oránssja.

+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: NUORRA ; 

LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM !!= @CODE@ Loan adjectives from norwegian/swedish (Not adjectives ending on -isk). Words like demonstrativ, transitiv, dupleks, informativ, analog, privat. Gives both "demonstratijvva" and "demonstratijvalasj". Two ways of adapting these adjectives are used, the adding of -lasj isn't okey, because that's a false derivation. But GG hasn't decided how these should be handled. Looks like noun instead of adjective when adapted without the -lasj ending.  Attr is in weak grad, used in strong grad ass pred even thou this seems a little bit odd "Værbba l transitijvva". 


+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_CMP_INFL ;


LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@   

                      :Q1   ATTR_PrsPrc         ; ! No vuohta derivation in this lexicon
                      :     N-EVENSTRONGSTEMadj ;
                      :Q1   N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj   ; ! cg in nominal paradigm
                      :%>Q1 BU/MUS              ;
    +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:Q1t  K-CONS              ; ! Presumably WeG as adverb as well
                      :     MUORRACmp           ;

 +Use/NotDNorm+Err/Der:X7l  MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ; !Err/der-taged since -lasj derivation isn't possible since there is no "demonstratijvva" noun. -lasj w.grade and vowel changes (not used since all lemmas end on letter a) demostratijvalasj
      +Err/Orth+Use/NG:l    MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ; ! Err/Orth-lasj with strong grade, demonstratijvvalasj


!            +Sg+Nom:Q1lasj%>      K-CONS              ;
!                   :Q1lasj%>      ATTR                ;
!   +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:Q1ladtja%>j   K-CONS              ;
!      +Err/Orth+Ess:Q1ladtja%>n   K-CONS              ;
!            +Sg+Ill:Q1lattja%>j   K-CONS              ;
!               +Ess:Q1lattja%>n   K-CONS              ;
!                   :Q1lattja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj   ;
!                   :Q1l%>         ABBO/AMOS           ;
! +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:Q1lattja%>t   K-CONS              ;
!         +Cmp/SgNom:Q1lasj%>      R                   ;
!         +Cmp/SgGen:Q1lattja%>    R                   ;
!         +Cmp/PlGen:Q1lattja%>j   R                   ;
!   +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:Q1ladtja%>    PxV                 ; !
!   +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:Q1ladtja%>s%> PxCi                ; !
!            +Sg+Nom:Q1lattja%>    PxV                 ; !
!            +Sg+Ill:Q1lattja%>s%> PxCi                ; !


! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: aktijvva # Even-syllable test
!!€ aktijva:                    aktijvva+A+Attr
!!€ aktijvva:                   aktijvva+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ aktijvav:                   aktijvva+A+Sg+Acc






LEXICON ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM !!= @CODE@ Same as DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM. Only for adjectives ending on -al. Words like digital,liberal, lokal.  Gives both "eksponentiálla" and "eksponentiálalasj". Different lexicon for these -al adjectives because of Err/Orth tags. OBS, "dialektal", is assimilated "dialevtalasj", and goes to lexicon  METÅVDÅLASJ.

+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: ÁLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP ;

LEXICON ÁLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP !!= @CODE@

            +Use/NotDNorm+Err/Der:álal           MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ; !No possible "digiálalasj" derivation since digitálla isn't a noun.
                                 :áll            ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;

                        +Err/Orth:all            ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;
                        +Err/Orth:elºl           ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;
                +Err/Orth+Area/NO:æ9lºl          ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;
         +Err/Orth+Use/NG+Area/SE:ä9lºl          ÁLLA-ÆLLA           ;
                        +Err/Orth:alal           MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
                        +Err/Orth:állal          MEKÁNALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
!                +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:álalasj%>      K-CONS              ;
!                       +Err/Orth:álalasj%>      ATTR                ;
!                       +Err/Orth:álalattja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj   ;
!                   +Ess+Err/Orth:álalattja%>n   K-CONS              ;
!          +Ess+Err/Orth+Err/Orth:álaladtja%>n   K-CONS              ;
!                +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:álalattja%>j   K-CONS              ;
!       +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth+Err/Orth:álaladtja%>j   K-CONS              ;
! !                     +Err/Orth:álal%>         ABBO/AMOS           ;
!     +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:álalattja%>t   K-CONS              ;
!             +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:álalasj%>      R                   ;
!             +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:álalattja%>    R                   ;
!             +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:álalattja%>j   R                   ;
!                +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:álaladtja%>    PxV                 ; ! Not possible with possesive suffixes, Case?
!                +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:álalattja%>    PxV                 ; ! Not possible with possesive suffixes, Case?
!                +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:álaladtja%>s%> PxCi                ; ! Not possible with possesive suffixes
!                +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:álalattja%>s%> PxCi                ; ! Not possible with possesive suffixes
