src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
akuhtta+A:akuhtta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
arktalasj+A:arktaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
automatihkalasj+A+Err/Orth:automahtal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
automatijvva+A:automatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
binormálla+A:binorm ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
biografijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:bio^gráffal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !^LOAN
boargálasj+A:boargáladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; ! ????
demokratijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:demo^kráhtal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
derivatijvva+A:derivatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
dialevtalasj+A+Err/Orth:di^alekt ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
dramatihkalasj+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dramatal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
dynámalasj+A+Err/Orth:dynama ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
dynámalasj+A+Err/Orth:dynábma DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
ekvivalænnta+A:ekvivalænnta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
elektrisitiehtalasj+A+Err/Orth:elektrihkal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !LOAN
elektronihkalasj+A+Err/Orth:elektrovnål MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !^LOAN
etihkalasj+A+Err/Orth:etal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !LOAN
feodálla+A:fe^od ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
filmatihkalasj+A+Err/Orth:filmáhtal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !^LOAN
finno-ugralasj+A:finno-ugraladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; ! LOAN
fonetihkalasj+A+Err/Orth:fonetaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
geometrijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:geometral MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !should be geometrijjalasj
geosentrálla+A:geo#sentr ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! LOAN
grekalasj+A+Err/Orth:grehkaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
gåhtalasj+A+Err/Orth:gohtaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; ! ????
homogiedna+A+Area/NO:homogiedna DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
idiåvmålasj+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:idi^omata MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
iehpenormálla+A:iehpe#norm ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! LOAN
impressijvva+A:im^pressijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
indoeuråvpålasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth:indo^europealadtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
inkompetænnta+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:inkompetænnta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
intelligænnta+A:intelligænnta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
kollegiálla+A:kollegi^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
kollektijvva+A:kollektijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
koreferentiálla+A:koreferenti^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
kvalitatijvva+A:kvalitatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
kymralasj+A:kymraladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; ! Kymrisk som gjelder kymrerne i Wales.
legendalasj+A+Err/Orth:legendáraladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
leksikåvnålasj+A+Err/Orth:leksik ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
læstadiánalasj+A:læstadiánaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
maksimálla+A+Area/NO:maksim ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
mentálla+A:ment ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
multimediálla+A:multimedi^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
norrødna+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:norrødna DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
nuorajpsykiatrijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:nuoraj#psykiatral MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !LOAN
nøytrálla+A+Area/NO:nøytr ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
originálla+A:origin ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
oránssja+A:oránssja ORÁNSSJA ; ! LOAN
produktijvva+A:produktijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
prosessalasj+A+Err/Orth+Area/NO:prosessu ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
psykiatrijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:psykiáhtral MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; !LOAN
restriktijvva+A:restriktijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
reálla+A:re ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
subitijvva+A:subitijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
suoma-ugralasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:suoma-ugraladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
suoma-ugralasj+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:suoma-ugralaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ; !
syntiehtalasj+A+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:syntehtaladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
systiemalasj+A+Err/Orth:systematal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
territåvrålasj+A+Err/Orth:territori ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
topografijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:topo^grafal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ;
turkijssa+A+Area/NO:turkijssa ORÁNSSJA ;
turkijssa+A+Area/SE:turkåvsså ORÁNSSJA ; ! SWE Turkos NOR turkis
turkijssa+A+Err/Orth:turkisa ORÁNSSJA ;
turkijssa+A+Err/Orth:turkosa ORÁNSSJA ;
ugralasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ugraladtj ARKTALASJ_NOT_DERIVED ;
økonomijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:økonomal MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS ; ! Feil, egentlig økonomijjalasj
